Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB195.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XI-AMENTAL HEALTH WORKFORCE RETENTION PROGRAMSection 1101-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Eligible applicant." A mental health worker who satisfies the eligibility requirements under section 1104-A."Grant." A grant issued by the department under this 12345678910111213141516171819 article."Mental health worker." An individual who is employed in the psychology, counseling, social work or human services field."Program." The Mental Health Workforce Retention Program established under section 1102-A."Recipient." A mental health worker who is selected by the department to receive a grant under the program.Section 1102-A. Mental Health Workforce Retention Program.The Mental Health Workforce Retention Program is established within the department for the purpose of awarding grants to mental health workers in accordance with this article.Section 1103-A. Duties of department.The department shall:(1) Provide grants to eligible applicants in accordance with the program.(2) Administer the program, including adopting regulations, policies, procedures and forms as are necessary to implement the program which are not inconsistent with the provisions of this article.Section 1104-A. Eligibility.To qualify for a grant under the program, a mental health worker must be:(1) a resident of this Commonwealth; and(2) employed as a mental health worker focusing on adolescents for at least seven consecutive years.Section 1105-A. Application for grant.(a) Application.--The department shall develop and publish on its publicly accessible Internet website an application by which an eligible applicant may apply for a grant.(b) Application requirements.--An application for a grant 20250HB0195PN0142 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 must be submitted to the department on or before the deadline for submittal of the application, as established by the department. The application must provide proof of eligibility as required under section 1104-A.Section 1106-A. Award of grants.(a) Lottery system.--The department shall develop a lottery system for selecting eligible applicants to receive a grant.(b) Total distribution.--Of the total amount appropriated to the department under section 1108-A(a), the department shall distribute no more than $1,000,000 in total grants to eligible applicants in any fiscal year.(c) Grant amount.--Each grant shall be in the amount of $5,000. No eligible applicant may receive more than one grant for the duration of the program.Section 1107-A. Tax applicability.A grant awarded under the program shall not be considered taxable income for the purposes of Article III of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 1108-A. Funding.(a) Appropriation.--The sum of $5,000,000 is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department from the General Fund for the purposes of awarding grants to recipients under the program. The appropriation shall not lapse at the end of any fiscal year.(b) Unused money.--If the department awards grants totaling less than $1,000,000 in a fiscal year, the department shall return the unused money for that fiscal year to the General Fund.Section 1109-A. Expiration of authority to award grants.The department's authority to award grants under the program 20250HB0195PN0142 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall expire June 30, 2030.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB0195PN0142 - 4 - 123